Missouri, session 2026, HB2202.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 252, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 252.252, to read as follows:
252.252. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Disabled veteran", an individual who:
(a) Is a resident of this state;
(b) Has been separated under honorable conditions from active service in:
a. Any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;
b. Any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States;
c. The National Guard of this state as defined in 32 U.S.C. Section 101, as
amended; or
d. Any defense force of this state as described in 32 U.S.C. Section 109, as
amended; and
(c) Has been certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its
successor agency to be in receipt of disability compensation at the one-hundred-percent
rate as a result of a service-connected disability claim allowed by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, with such disability being permanent and sustained
through military action or accident or resulting from disease contracted while in such
active service;
(2) "Eligible dependent", an individual who is:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2202 2
(a) The spouse of an individual who is military personnel or a disabled veteran;
or
(b) A minor who is the dependent of military personnel or a disabled veteran;
(3) "Military personnel", an individual in active military service in:
(a) Any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(b) Any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(c) The National Guard of any state as defined in 32 U.S.C. Section 101, as
amended; or
(d) Any defense force of this state as described in 32 U.S.C. Section 109, as
amended.
2. The conservation commission shall:
(1) Issue free of charge any hunting permit or fishing permit required by state
law or state rules or regulations to military personnel, a disabled veteran, and an eligible
dependent;
(2) Waive all fees required for Missouri hunter education certification or its
successor program for military personnel, a disabled veteran, or an eligible dependent;
(3) Issue free of charge a combined lifetime hunting and fishing permit to
military personnel or a disabled veteran, or an individual who is the surviving spouse of
such military personnel or disabled veteran, who has been awarded a Purple Heart
under Section 1129 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended; and
(4) Issue free of charge any deer hunting permit that is valid for the youth
portions of the deer seasons to an eligible dependent who is a minor and whose age
qualifies such individual for a youth deer hunting permit.
3. The conservation commission shall require an individual seeking a permit or a
waiver of fees under this section to establish such individual's identity and eligibility for
a permit or waiver of fees under this section at the time such individual applies for such
permit or waiver of fees.
✔